Mississippi, session 2026, HB897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Interagency Task Force on Homelessness is created within the Mississippi Department of Human Services to facilitate and implement initiatives to decrease homelessness and unnecessary institutionalization in this state, improve health and human services outcomes for people who experience homelessness, and strengthen the safety nets that contribute to housing stability.  The task force shall: (a)  Develop a state plan to address homelessness and unnecessary institutionalization with the goals of achieving functional zero homelessness, improving health and human services outcomes for people experiencing homelessness, and strengthening the safety nets that contribute to housing stability; (b)  Recommend policy, regulatory and resource distribution changes necessary to accomplish the goals and objectives laid out in the state plan; (c)  Serve within state government and in the state at large as an advocate for people experiencing homelessness; (d)  Provide leadership for and collaborate with those developing and implementing local plans to end homelessness in Mississippi, including, but not limited to, the Community Advisory Council created in Section 2 of this act and its members; (e)  Recommend the resources needed for successful implementation of the state plan and oversee that implementation; (f)  Recommend and promote effective interagency collaboration and system integration to converge related efforts; and (g)  Make oversight recommendations that will ensure accountability, results and sustained success; and (h)  Develop specific proposals and recommendations for action to provide to the Governor and the Legislature. (2)  The task force may solicit feedback from stakeholders and advocates to inform task force recommendations as necessary.  In addition, the task force may request advice from the Mississippi Interagency Council on Homelessness created in Section 43-1-101, and the council shall provide such information as requested and otherwise cooperate with the task force. (3)  The task force shall be composed of the following members: (a)  The Executive Director of Human Services or his or her designee, who shall be the chair of the task force; (b)  The Executive Director of the State Department of Mental Health or his or her designee; (c)  The Executive Director of the State Department of Health or his or her designee; (d)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services or his or her designee; (e)  The State Superintendent of Public Education or his or her designee; (f)  The Commissioner of Public Safety or his or her designee; (g)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Corrections or his or her designee; (h)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration or his or her designee; (i)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Employment Security or his or her designee; (j)  The Executive Director of the State Veterans Affairs Board or his or her designee; (k)  The Commissioner of Higher Education or his or her designee; (l)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Community College Board or his or her designee; (m)  The Director of the Administrative Office of Courts or his or her designee; (n)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Home Corporation or his or her designee; (o)  The Executive Director of Accelerate Mississippi or his or her designee; (p)  One (1) member of the Senate appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (q)  One (1) member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker; (r)  The Minority Leader of the House or his or her designee; and (s)  The Minority Leader of the Senate or his or her designee. (4)  The chair of the task force may appoint additional representatives from state agencies as needed. (5)  The task force shall meet at the call of the chair, at least four (4) times per year, with the first meeting being called no later than July 1, 2026.  Members of the task force shall serve without compensation. (6)  On or before December 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, the task force shall submit a report to the Governor, the Speaker of the Mississippi House of Representatives, the Lieutenant Governor, the Chairman of the House of Representatives Public Health and Human Services Committee, the chairman of the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee and any other member of the Legislature upon request, regarding the task force's work during the prior year, any recommendations developed by the task force, any recommendations made by the Community Advisory Council on Homelessness, and any key outcomes and measures related to homelessness. (7)  The task force may establish subcommittees to address specific issues or populations and may collaborate with individuals with relevant expertise who are not members of the task force to assist the subcommittee in carrying out its duties. (8)  The Department of Human Services shall provide staff and administrative support to the task force. (9)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to contravene any federal or state law or regulation. Unless specifically referenced in this section, nothing in this section shall affect or alter the existing statutory powers of any state agency or be construed as a reassignment or reorganization of any state agency. SECTION 2. (1)  The Community Advisory Council on Homelessness is created within the Mississippi Department of Human Services to advise the Interagency Task Force on Homelessness created in Section 1 of this act on its mission to achieve functional zero homelessness in the state and make recommendations to the task force regarding decreasing homelessness and unnecessary institutionalization, improving health and human services outcomes for people experiencing homelessness and strengthening the safety nets that contribute to housing stability. (2)  The members of the advisory council shall be appointed by the Governor and shall consist of diverse stakeholders who shall be geographically diverse to represent the needs of urban, suburban and rural communities across Mississippi, and shall reflect the racial, ethnic and geographic diversity of this state.  Members of the advisory council shall include, but not be limited to, individuals with lived experience of homelessness or housing insecurity, and representatives from the following organizations:  Disability Rights Mississippi, Shower Power, Community Foundation for Mississippi, NAMI Mississippi, Mississippi Housing Partnership, Central Mississippi Continuum of Care, Mississippi United to End Homelessness (MUTEH), Mississippi Coalition Against Domestic Violence, Open Doors Homeless Coalition, Reaching and Educating for Community Hope (RECH) Foundation, Mississippi Center for Police and Sheriffs, and Jackson Resource Center. (3)  The meetings of the advisory council shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the Open Meetings Act.  The Department of Human Services shall provide staff and administrative support to assist the advisory council in carrying out its duties. (4)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to contravene any federal or state law or regulation. Unless specifically referenced in this section, nothing in this section shall affect or alter the existing statutory powers of any state agency or be construed as a reassignment or reorganization of any state agency. (5)  On or before November 15, 2026, and each year thereafter, the advisory council shall submit recommendations to the Interagency Task Force on Homelessness. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.